Wisconsin, session 2025, AB518.
do enact as follows:AB518,1Section 1. 118.60 (2) (a) 6. a. of the statutes is amended to read:118.60 (2) (a) 6. a. Except as provided in subd. 6. c. and, d., and e., all of the private school’s teachers have a teaching license issued by the department or a bachelor’s degree or a degree or educational credential higher than a bachelor’s degree, including a masters or doctorate, from a nationally or regionally accredited institution of higher education.AB518,2Section 2. 118.60 (2) (a) 6. e. of the statutes is created to read:118.60 (2) (a) 6. e. An individual employed by the private school who holds a substitute teacher permit issued by the department under s. 118.19 (7m) may teach at the private school as allowed under the substitute teacher permit.AB518,3Section 3. 119.23 (2) (a) 6. a. of the statutes is amended to read:119.23 (2) (a) 6. a. Except as provided in subd. 6. c. and d., all of the private school’s teachers have a teaching license issued by the department or a bachelor’s degree or a degree or educational credential higher than a bachelor’s degree, including a masters or doctorate, from a nationally or regionally accredited institution of higher education.AB518,4Section 4. 119.23 (2) (a) 6. d. of the statutes is created to read:119.23 (2) (a) 6. d. An individual employed by the private school who holds a substitute teacher permit issued by the department under s. 118.19 (7m) may teach at the private school as allowed under the substitute teacher permit. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab518 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab518 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB518 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB518 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB518: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting